Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB713.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 216.701 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 216.701 to 216.709[this chapter]:
(1) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(2) "Health care worker" means any person, whether licensed or unlicensed,
temporarily or permanently employed by, volunteering in, or under contract with a
health facility, who has direct contact with a patient of the health facility for
purposes of either medical care or emergency response situations potentially
involving violence;
(3)[(2)] "Health facility" has the same meaning as in KRS 216B.015;
(4)[(3)] "Workplace" means any property that is owned or leased by the health facility
at which the official business of the health care worker is conducted;
(5)[(4)] "Workplace safety" means the process of protecting health care workers'
physical well-being from workplace violence; and
(6)[(5)] "Workplace violence" means any act or threat of physical violence,
harassment, intimidation, or other threatening disruptive behavior that occurs at the
workplace.
Section 2. KRS 216.703 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [By January 1, 2024, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall develop and
disperse the following information to health facilities:
(a) Guidelines for developing a workplace safety assessment;
(b) Examples of a workplace safety plan; and
(c) Examples of workplace safety standards specific to preventing workplace
violence against health care workers.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2025, the cabinet shall annually audit health facilities for
compliance with the provisions of KRS 216.701 to 216.709.
Page 1 of 7
HB071310.100 - 373 - XXXX 3/9/2026 4:27 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 713/GA
(3) ]Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the cabinet shall accept
that a health facility is in compliance with KRS 216.701 to 216.709 if the health
facility:
(a) Is accredited by a[the Joint Commission or another] nationally recognized
accrediting organization [with comparable standards and survey processes,
that is ]approved by the United States Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services; or
(b) 1. Is recognized by the United States Office of the Inspector General as a
health facility certified to participate in the Medicare and Medicaid
programs by the United States Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services, provided that the health facility annually attests to the
cabinet, on a form and in a manner determined by the cabinet, that the
health facility:
a. Maintains a workplace safety assessment and workplace safety
plan that meets or exceeds the standards required by its
accrediting organization;
b. Provides violence prevention training to all health care workers
upon hire and annually thereafter;
c. Maintains an internal reporting system through which health
care workers may report incidents of workplace violence;
d. Prohibits retaliation against any health care worker who makes
a report of workplace violence in good faith; and
e. Conducts periodic reviews of incidents of workplace violence and
updates its workplace safety plan as needed.
2. Notwithstanding subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, the cabinet may
require a health facility to comply with the requirements of KRS
216.701 to 216.709 if the cabinet determines, based on objective
Page 2 of 7
HB071310.100 - 373 - XXXX 3/9/2026 4:27 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 713/GA
evidence obtained through licensure survey or substantiated
complaint, and not in an arbitrary or capricious manner, that the
health facility's workplace safety assessment or workplace safety plan
has failed to reasonably identify, mitigate, or respond to risks of
workplace violence.
3. A health facility subject to the requirements of subparagraph 2. of this
paragraph shall remain subject to the requirements until the cabinet
determines that the health facility has remedied the deficiencies and
may resume safe harbor status.
(2) All health facilities, including any health facility deemed to be in compliance with
KRS 216.701 to 216.709 in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, shall
display a notice that shall:
(a) Be a legible printed sign at least eight and one-half (8.5) inches by eleven
(11) inches in size, with letters in at least sixteen (16) point font;
(b) Be displayed in a prominent location in each health facility, including but
not limited to the main entrance, major patient waiting area, visitor
management area, emergency room, and other high traffic areas; and
(c) Indicate that any form of threatening or aggressive behavior toward health
care workers will not be tolerated and could result in consequences
including a felony conviction[;
(c) Is licensed as an assisted living community pursuant to KRS Chapter 194A; or
(d) Is any provider that accepts payment for services from an individual receiving
state supplementation pursuant to KRS 205.245].
(3)[(4)] The cabinet shall promulgate the necessary administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to effectuate the provisions of KRS 216.701 to
216.709.
Section 3. KRS 216.705 is amended to read as follows:
Page 3 of 7
HB071310.100 - 373 - XXXX 3/9/2026 4:27 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 713/GA
(1) (a) Health facilities shall develop and execute a workplace safety assessment to
identify the risk of workplace violence against health care workers.
(b) Health facilities shall create a workplace safety plan to address the risks
identified in the workplace safety assessment. Each health facility shall
develop the workplace safety plan in a way that affords appropriate
representation from all the different types of health care workers operating on
the premises.
(2) The workplace safety assessment described in subsection (1)(a) of this section shall
outline strategies aimed at addressing security considerations and factors that may
contribute to or present the risk of workplace violence, including but not limited to
the following:
(a) The physical attributes of the health facility setting, including security
systems, alarms, emergency response, and security personnel available;
(b) Staffing, including staffing patterns, patient classifications, and procedures to
mitigate violence against health care workers;
(c) Job design, equipment, and facilities;
(d) First aid and emergency procedures;
(e) The reporting of violent acts;
(f) Health care worker education and training requirements and implementation
strategy;
(g) Security risks associated with specific units, areas of the health facility with
uncontrolled access, late night or early morning shifts, and health care worker
security in areas surrounding the health facility such as the parking areas; and
(h) Intervention procedures for providing assistance to a health care worker
directly affected by an incident of workplace violence.
(3) Health facilities shall annually:
(a) Conduct a workplace safety assessment;
Page 4 of 7
HB071310.100 - 373 - XXXX 3/9/2026 4:27 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 713/GA
(b) Review the workplace violence incidents from the previous year for patterns
that indicate risk;[ and]
(c) Review the workplace safety plan and make any necessary adjustments; and
(d) Inform health care workers of any changes to policies or procedures or
changes to the workplace safety plan based on the requirements in this
subsection[.
(4) In developing the workplace safety assessment and safety plan required by
subsections (1) to (3) of this section, the health facility shall consider any guidelines
on workplace safety standards issued by the cabinet pursuant to KRS 216.703].
Section 4. KRS 216.709 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Health facilities shall develop an internal reporting system for acts of workplace
violence committed against a health care worker, patient, or visitor on the health
facility's premises, and shall train health care workers on the proper reporting
procedure for when health care workers experience or witness workplace
violence.
(2) Health facilities shall maintain a record of reported acts of workplace violence
committed against a health care worker, patient, or visitor on the health facility's
premises. Each record shall be kept for five (5) years following the date the act was
reported, during which time the record shall be available for inspection by the
cabinet upon request. The report shall include:
(a) The health facility's name and address;
(b) The date, time, and specific location on the health facility's premises where
the reported workplace violence occurred;
(c) The name, job title, department or ward assignment, and staff identification or
Social Security number of the victim;
(d) A description of the person against whom the act was committed as:
1. A patient;
Page 5 of 7
HB071310.100 - 373 - XXXX 3/9/2026 4:27 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 713/GA
2. A visitor;
3. A health care worker; or
4. Other;
(e) A description of the person who allegedly committed the violent act as:
1. A patient;
2. A visitor;
3. An employee; or
4. Other;
(f) A description of the type of workplace violence committed as:
1. Harassment, verbal abuse, or other threatening and violent behavior with
no physical contact or violence;
2. Physical violence resulting in mild soreness, surface abrasions,
scratches, or small bruises;
3. Physical violence resulting in major soreness, cuts, or large bruises;
4. Physical violence resulting in severe lacerations, a bone fracture, or a
head injury; or
5. Physical violence resulting in loss of limb or death;
(g) An identification of any body part injured;
(h) A description of any weapon used;
(i) The number of health care workers in the vicinity of the act when it occurred;
and
(j) A description of actions taken by employees of the health facility in response
to the act.
(3) Health facilities shall develop a procedure to follow up with individuals who
experienced[victims of the] reported acts of workplace violence that requires the
health facility to inform the individual of actions taken after the incident and any
plan for future action.
Page 6 of 7
HB071310.100 - 373 - XXXX 3/9/2026 4:27 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 713/GA
(4) Health facilities shall provide individuals who experienced[victims of] workplace
violence with support, which may include access to physical and mental health
resources.
Page 7 of 7
HB071310.100 - 373 - XXXX 3/9/2026 4:27 PM GA